Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-938
Charge, solicitation, acceptance, or receipt; unlawful; when.

A person violates the False Medicaid Claims Act, and a claim submitted with regard to a good or service is deemed to be false and subjects such person to civil liability as provided in section 68-936, if he or she, acting on behalf of a provider providing such good or service to a recipient under the medical assistance program, charges, solicits, accepts, or receives anything of value in addition to the amount legally payable under the medical assistance program in connection with a provision of such good or service knowing that such charge, solicitation, acceptance, or receipt is not legally payable.

Laws 2004, LB 1084, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,2004, § 68-1077;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 38.